lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2980 Y 1
SFX 2980 0 -threefold .
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 0 pling .
SFX 3866 Y 1
SFX 3866 0 orisation .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 0 que .
SFX 4269 Y 1
SFX 4269 0 bodies .
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 0 aments .
SFX 2535 Y 1
SFX 2535 0 efulness .
SFX 4600 Y 1
SFX 4600 0 shoots .
SFX 4941 Y 1
SFX 4941 0 mally .
SFX 2872 Y 1
SFX 2872 0 iana's .
SFX 2695 Y 1
SFX 2695 0 scope .
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 0 ender's .
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 0 erners .
SFX 2262 Y 1
SFX 2262 0 alisers .
SFX 3517 Y 1
SFX 3517 0 chester .
SFX 2383 Y 1
SFX 2383 0 ore's .
SFX 3827 Y 1
SFX 3827 0 printing .
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 0 ial's .
SFX 4254 Y 1
SFX 4254 0 centric .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 alling .
SFX 3565 Y 1
SFX 3565 0 -making .
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 0 ment .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 pering .
SFX 2010 Y 1
SFX 2010 0 dal .
SFX 4235 Y 1
SFX 4235 0 dan .
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 0 day .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 fulnesses .
SFX 4929 Y 1
SFX 4929 0 mere .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 mers .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 ded .
SFX 4232 Y 1
SFX 4232 0 del .
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 den .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 der .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 des .
SFX 4083 Y 1
SFX 4083 0 ika's .
SFX 626 Y 1
SFX 626 0 ge's .
SFX 3945 Y 1
SFX 3945 0 missions .
SFX 4228 Y 1
SFX 4228 0 dic .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 die .
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 man's .
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 0 ivating .
SFX 2914 Y 1
SFX 2914 0 erless .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 ture .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 dog .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 dom .
SFX 1025 Y 1
SFX 1025 0 don .
SFX 2930 Y 1
SFX 2930 0 dor .
SFX 4034 Y 1
SFX 4034 0 keep .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 tresses .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 worthy .
SFX 2212 Y 1
SFX 2212 0 gram .
SFX 2076 Y 1
SFX 2076 0 tist's .
SFX 3697 Y 1
SFX 3697 0 tain's .
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 0 ously .
SFX 1110 Y 1
SFX 1110 0 yards .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 lighted .
SFX 4156 Y 1
SFX 4156 0 fications .
SFX 4182 Y 1
SFX 4182 0 escences .
SFX 3401 Y 1
SFX 3401 0 ialist's .
SFX 2500 Y 1
SFX 2500 0 grams .
SFX 3492 Y 1
SFX 3492 0 dless .
SFX 3141 Y 1
SFX 3141 0 sis's .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 alistic .
SFX 4126 Y 1
SFX 4126 0 hting .
SFX 4031 Y 1
SFX 4031 0 kest .
SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 0 otte .
SFX 1076 Y 1
SFX 1076 0 it's .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 izability .
SFX 4030 Y 1
SFX 4030 0 keys .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 ying .
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 0 one's .
SFX 1270 Y 1
SFX 1270 0 -down .
SFX 3558 Y 1
SFX 3558 0 ading .
SFX 2527 Y 1
SFX 2527 0 erner's .
SFX 3986 Y 1
SFX 3986 0 lizers .
SFX 1367 Y 1
SFX 1367 0 ularly .
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 0 birds .
SFX 4599 Y 1
SFX 4599 0 si's .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 tley's .
SFX 1048 Y 1
SFX 1048 0 time's .
SFX 2574 Y 1
SFX 2574 0 aced .
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 0 aces .
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 0 ologists .
SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 0 mund's .
SFX 4315 Y 1
SFX 4315 0 ail's .
SFX 3051 Y 1
SFX 3051 0 uration .
SFX 4092 Y 1
SFX 4092 0 ient .
SFX 819 Y 1
SFX 819 0 fish's .
SFX 4902 Y 1
SFX 4902 0 nburg .
SFX 3633 Y 1
SFX 3633 0 ulsion .
SFX 4356 Y 1
SFX 4356 0 wick .
SFX 746 Y 1
SFX 746 0 iers .
SFX 3881 Y 1
SFX 3881 0 oid's .
SFX 555 Y 1
SFX 555 0 lyn's .
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 0 erly .
SFX 3371 Y 1
SFX 3371 0 imate .
SFX 3001 Y 1
SFX 3001 0 -fourths .
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 0 ership .
SFX 2526 Y 1
SFX 2526 0 erns .
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 ce's .
SFX 3439 Y 1
SFX 3439 0 fighting .
SFX 2685 Y 1
SFX 2685 0 sha .
SFX 3572 Y 1
SFX 3572 0 -born .
SFX 3754 Y 1
SFX 3754 0 seness's .
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 0 ection .
SFX 1806 Y 1
SFX 1806 0 ancies .
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 0 erts .
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 0 mark's .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 teenth .
SFX 4981 Y 1
SFX 4981 0 lful .
SFX 1111 Y 1
SFX 1111 0 wise .
SFX 4165 Y 1
SFX 4165 0 fares .
SFX 4562 Y 1
SFX 4562 0 sta .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 0 sts .
SFX 2665 Y 1
SFX 2665 0 sty .
SFX 2996 Y 1
SFX 2996 0 -mindedness .
SFX 4086 Y 1
SFX 4086 0 igned .
SFX 2868 Y 1
SFX 2868 0 icians .
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 0 bill's .
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 0 erating .
SFX 3902 Y 1
SFX 3902 0 nising .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 tained .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 0 gest .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 et's .
SFX 2833 Y 1
SFX 2833 0 keeping .
SFX 2944 Y 1
SFX 2944 0 brush .
SFX 4195 Y 1
SFX 4195 0 erative .
SFX 4290 Y 1
SFX 4290 0 asting .
SFX 3058 Y 1
SFX 3058 0 uing .
SFX 2844 Y 1
SFX 2844 0 ital .
SFX 2305 Y 1
SFX 2305 0 u's .
SFX 3206 Y 1
SFX 3206 0 ralisation .
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 0 -day .
SFX 4436 Y 1
SFX 4436 0 ualising .
SFX 4120 Y 1
SFX 4120 0 ialness's .
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 0 aways .
SFX 4218 Y 1
SFX 4218 0 eeds .
SFX 1318 Y 1
SFX 1318 0 ited .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 ites .
SFX 1582 Y 1
SFX 1582 0 ise's .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 uits .
SFX 3337 Y 1
SFX 3337 0 keeping's .
SFX 3050 Y 1
SFX 3050 0 uration's .
SFX 3897 Y 1
SFX 3897 0 nity's .
SFX 4056 Y 1
SFX 4056 0 itis .
SFX 3746 Y 1
SFX 3746 0 sheet .
SFX 4166 Y 1
SFX 4166 0 eye's .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 craft .
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 0 ards .
SFX 2307 Y 1
SFX 2307 0 troke .
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 0 someness's .
SFX 2317 Y 1
SFX 2317 0 tin's .
SFX 4068 Y 1
SFX 4068 0 ior's .
SFX 3965 Y 1
SFX 3965 0 lude .
SFX 4598 Y 1
SFX 4598 0 sian .
SFX 4846 Y 1
SFX 4846 0 nson's .
SFX 3484 Y 1
SFX 3484 0 eens .
SFX 4215 Y 1
SFX 4215 0 eler's .
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 0 backs .
SFX 3737 Y 1
SFX 3737 0 sick .
SFX 1587 Y 1
SFX 1587 0 ilities .
SFX 4362 Y 1
SFX 4362 0 vy's .
SFX 4591 Y 1
SFX 4591 0 sied .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 sier .
SFX 934 Y 1
SFX 934 0 sies .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 eers .
SFX 4503 Y 1
SFX 4503 0 therapy .
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 0 fly .
SFX 1326 Y 1
SFX 1326 0 ica's .
SFX 2623 Y 1
SFX 2623 0 uality's .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 0 fight .
SFX 1800 Y 1
SFX 1800 0 berry .
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 0 over .
SFX 966 Y 1
SFX 966 0 fishes .
SFX 3613 Y 1
SFX 3613 0 valent .
SFX 1292 Y 1
SFX 1292 0 sion .
SFX 3040 Y 1
SFX 3040 0 utation's .
SFX 1827 Y 1
SFX 1827 0 using .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 een's .
SFX 1522 Y 1
SFX 1522 0 top's .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 illa's .
SFX 4465 Y 1
SFX 4465 0 toring .
SFX 3753 Y 1
SFX 3753 0 senesses .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 0 marked .
SFX 1345 Y 1
SFX 1345 0 cakes .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 0 logists .
SFX 4998 Y 1
SFX 4998 0 law's .
SFX 2018 Y 1
SFX 2018 0 cloth's .
SFX 1365 Y 1
SFX 1365 0 ulated .
SFX 1364 Y 1
SFX 1364 0 ulates .
SFX 1287 Y 1
SFX 1287 0 stick .
SFX 2142 Y 1
SFX 2142 0 ouring .
SFX 2557 Y 1
SFX 2557 0 at's .
SFX 2600 Y 1
SFX 2600 0 ward's .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 h's .
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 0 alizations .
SFX 3325 Y 1
SFX 3325 0 lication .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 rida's .
SFX 3636 Y 1
SFX 3636 0 ulator .
SFX 1141 Y 1
SFX 1141 0 mie's .
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 0 eted .
SFX 1598 Y 1
SFX 1598 0 eter .
SFX 803 Y 1
SFX 803 0 ual .
SFX 4107 Y 1
SFX 4107 0 icating .
SFX 2517 Y 1
SFX 2517 0 etic .
SFX 4426 Y 1
SFX 4426 0 uce .
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 0 mer's .
SFX 4421 Y 1
SFX 4421 0 uct .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 0 ued .
SFX 4417 Y 1
SFX 4417 0 uel .
SFX 1646 Y 1
SFX 1646 0 ues .
SFX 3763 Y 1
SFX 3763 0 sburg's .
SFX 1845 Y 1
SFX 1845 0 ten's .
SFX 1645 Y 1
SFX 1645 0 uit .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 0 ry's .
SFX 3136 Y 1
SFX 3136 0 spring .
SFX 4332 Y 1
SFX 4332 0 -out's .
SFX 4772 Y 1
SFX 4772 0 ourer's .
SFX 3398 Y 1
SFX 3398 0 ianne .
SFX 2300 Y 1
SFX 2300 0 ume .
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 0 ums .
SFX 866 Y 1
SFX 866 0 ator's .
SFX 1853 Y 1
SFX 1853 0 somenesses .
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 0 tings .
SFX 2763 Y 1
SFX 2763 0 ographers .
SFX 1830 Y 1
SFX 1830 0 use .
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 0 eness's .
SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 0 edness' .
SFX 546 Y 1
SFX 546 0 ionally .
SFX 3655 Y 1
SFX 3655 0 toning .
SFX 698 Y 1
SFX 698 0 alising .
SFX 4535 Y 1
SFX 4535 0 talls .
SFX 4112 Y 1
SFX 4112 0 icalness's .
SFX 3113 Y 1
SFX 3113 0 tally .
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 0 enting .
SFX 822 Y 1
SFX 822 0 downs .
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 0 ector's .
SFX 2938 Y 1
SFX 2938 0 class .
SFX 1619 Y 1
SFX 1619 0 burg's .
SFX 4859 Y 1
SFX 4859 0 nized .
SFX 4858 Y 1
SFX 4858 0 nizes .
SFX 2796 Y 1
SFX 2796 0 mill .
SFX 3460 Y 1
SFX 3460 0 ers's .
SFX 3463 Y 1
SFX 3463 0 erlies .
SFX 565 Y 1
SFX 565 0 ality's .
SFX 1915 Y 1
SFX 1915 0 mine .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 ming .
SFX 3634 Y 1
SFX 3634 0 ulators .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 0 ham .
