lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Ina/1,1427,4235
Jess/1,16,18,21,30,31,33,53,61,75,106,189,214,229,255,407,527,1326,1327,2384,2385,4083,4084,4796
Louis/1,16,21,30,33,123,282,306,526,700,2702,2872,2873
Mari/193,225,282,306,490,522,531,543,555,570,573,660,689,690,858,859,898,923,947,985,1035,1036,1264,1501,1502,1505,1801,1802,1805,1848,2001,2036,2235,2570,2951,2952,3551,3697,4232
Naur/1,2305
Van/1,8,111,120,133,158,208,264,292,333,337,345,368,385,397,404,483,530,923,985,1761,2010
West/1,2,101,114,123,156,249,294,323,346,416,448,514,550,566,598,749,787,793,892,935,950,1242,1496,1538,1727,1755,1983,2418,2526,2754,2792,2819,2913,2945,3295,3463,3517
cash/1,3,4,8,9,14,34,50,562,564,652,721,746,1585,4169,4929
come/232,238,269,270,307,359,375,444,460,501,649,720,822,1024,3691,4228
ego/1,2,47,59,65,67,73,79,291,1077,2075,2076,2077,4254
hem/1,2,8,16,21,219,231,237,285,304,331,409,430,517,571,615,956,1069,1070,2377
medic/1,2,25,28,68,89,94,102,104,137,142,162,190,223,236,241,266,473,593,1082,1160,2970,2971,2972,3627,3629,3630
mid/75,84,191,194,203,273,287,307,313,323,360,446,460,536,550,632,720,778,835,941,982,1027,1106,1115,1133,1252,1253,1340,1384,1616,1684,1729,1789,2029,2673,3554,3567,3651,3706,4550,4551,4723,4868,4978
mos/8,26,97,189,568,857,1211,1682,2227,2368,3450
mourn/2,3,4,9,12,14,29,32,108,165,177,205,240,1165,1166
north/1,2,3,9,12,14,32,90,203,416,514,598,787,1029,1983,2526,2527,2913,3463,4357
off/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,28,29,32,115,137,152,156,355,367,481,523,581,747,752,783,807,860,1020,1164,1170,1201,1222,1294,1325,1432,1482,1605,1774,1777,1973,1993,1994,2346,2347,2369,2370,2917,2918,2998,3136,3144,3211,3410,3497,3723,3739,3827,3828,3975,4201,4281,4282,4461,4560,4600,4958
plea/1,2,6,26,48,57,63,82,97,119,178,209,216,218,280,283,293,303,338,364,540,627,673,732,2689,3119,3142,3494,3701,3702,4588
policy/1,684,1011,2582,3565
prejudge/2,6,7,13,15,41,42,44,2423,2424,3294
prov/3,4,8,12,35,83,186,206,299,349,352,376,502,548,1324,1589,1959,1993,1994,2480,2766,2918,3261,3886,4098,4202,4776
riv/28,137,355,979,1181,1627,1807
sen/6,26,100,105,111,118,120,142,178,190,218,283,338,364,494,533,796,824,866,1162,1216,1280,1586,1587,1649,1741,1911,2072,2461,2462,4068,4181,4182,4183
seventy/155,2577,2578,2579,2580,2978,2979,2980,2981,2982,2983,2984,2985,2986,2987,2988,2989,2990,2991,2992,2993,2994,2995,3001,3002,3003,3004,3005,3006,3007,3008,3009,3010,3011,3012,3013
sign/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,29,100,105,118,145,167,171,197,284,330,374,551,563,594,620,621,622,745,782,817,1063,1087,1216,1417,1547,1877,2372,2373,2383,2963,2964,4287
some/313,679,1027,3089,3404,3535,3835,3952,4269
spa/1,2,15,18,19,26,27,40,63,71,97,147,178,179,184,216,218,259,290,292,310,338,385,395,608,681,829,863,913,937,992,1177,1230,1257,1258,1343,1493,1536,1679,2022,2048,2071,2113,2324,2541,2590,2603,2604,2627,2648,3511,3512,3580,4248,4253,4352,4493,4501,4669,4853
stereo/1,2,3,4,1474,1475,1762,2695,3156,3157,3761
stop/1,2,76,109,113,207,250,251,612,639,663,738,779,809,894,995,996,998,1132,1205,1207,1535,1675,1685,1686,1691,1792,1872,1879,2013,2014,2056,2111,2128,2361,2602,2701,3032,3035,3222,3234,3600,3773,4359,4376,4767
tot/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,16,25,28,32,48,57,82,127,137,355,418,434,437,565,674,697,979,1050,1181,1627,1653,1654,1807,2039,2260,2261,2262,2263,2264,2532,2572,3475,3553,4206,4515
trans/969,1302,1420,1487,1488,2144,2374,2389,2731,2732,3216,3217,3218,3219,3283,3929,3945,3946,3947,4092,4093,4094
tun/2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,29,30,32,33,35,43,151,159,194,208,254,264,299,333,349,512,708,1245,1613,1705,1785,1905,2003,2237,2534,2535,3277,3479,3483
tutor/1754
val/8,16,21,100,105,118,145,171,197,294,346,365,415,433,523,551,563,581,672,1021,1112,1186,1188,1275,1300,1337,1415,1484,1646,1647,2290,2302,2303,2304,2380,2381,2442,2568,2569,2617,2620,2621,3058,3062,3063,3244,3399,3640,3866,4118,4119
wash/3,4,8,9,12,14,18,29,32,34,35,36,152,156,284,319,330,332,371,374,388,464,489,509,529,538,600,1027,1253,1383,1491,1510,1530,2017,2018,2091
wed/1,2,131,135,178,216,218,392,549,626,627,644,645,673,956,1069,1070,1241,1478
zip/1,2,109,113,250,251,466,609,610,995,996
